Hawaii statutes.
§660-13 Issuance to person of unknown name.
If the name of the person by whom the party is alleged to be restrained of the
party's liberty is unknown or uncertain, the person may be described by an
assumed appellation. Whoever is served with the writ or order to show cause,
shall be deemed to be the person intended thereby. [L 1870, c 32, §9; RL 1925,
§2736; RL 1935, §4321; RL 1945, §10362; am L 1953, c 101, §9; RL 1955, §239-13;
HRS §660-13; am L 1972, c 90, §5(g); gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next